Washington statutes.
RCW 33.12.170

May borrow from home loan bank.

See RCW 30A.32.030.

NOTES:

Home loan bank as depositary: RCW 30A.32.040.

Investment in federal home loan bank stock or bonds authorized: RCW 30A.32.020.